Georgia, session 2025_26, HB277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
excise tax on rooms, lodgings, and accommodations, is amended in Code Section 48-13-50.2,
relating to definitions regarding such taxes, by revising paragraph (2) as follows:
"(2) 'Innkeeper' means any person who is subject to taxation under this article for the
furnishing for value to the public any rooms, lodgings, or accommodations."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
H. B. 277
- 1 -

LC 50 1028
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 277
- 2 -